Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101, as


last amended by Section 3, Chapter 330, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 6-101), is amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 2499 Page 1


Section 6-101. A. No person, except those hereinafter


expressly exempted in Sections 6-102 and 6-102.1 of this title,


shall operate any motor vehicle upon a highway in this state unless


the person has a valid Oklahoma driver license for the class of


vehicle being operated under the provisions of this title. No


person shall be permitted to possess more than one valid license at


any time, except as provided in paragraph 4 of subsection F of this


section.


B. 1. No person shall operate a Class A commercial motor


vehicle unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and


holds a valid Class A commercial license, except as provided in


paragraph 5 of this subsection and subsection F of this section.


Any person holding a valid Class A commercial license shall be


permitted to operate motor vehicles in Classes A, B, C and D, except


as provided for in paragraph 4 of this subsection.


2. No person shall operate a Class B commercial motor vehicle


unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and holds a


valid Class B commercial license, except as provided in paragraph 5


of this subsection and subsection F of this section. Any person


holding a valid Class B commercial license shall be permitted to


operate motor vehicles in Classes B, C and D, except as provided for


in paragraph 4 of this subsection.


3. No person shall operate a Class C commercial motor vehicle


unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and holds a

Req. No. 2499 Page 2


valid Class C commercial license, except as provided in subsection F


of this section. Any person holding a valid Class C commercial


license shall be permitted to operate motor vehicles in Classes C


and D, except as provided for in paragraph 4 of this subsection.


4. No person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall be


licensed to operate any motor vehicle which is required to be


placarded for hazardous materials pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Part 172,


subpart F, except as provided in subsection F of this section;


provided, a person eighteen (18) years of age or older may be


licensed to operate a farm vehicle which is required to be placarded


for hazardous materials pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Part 172, subpart F,


except as provided in subsection F of this section.


5. A person at least seventeen (17) years of age who


successfully completes all examinations required by law may be


issued by Service Oklahoma:


a. a restricted Class A commercial license which shall


grant to the licensee the privilege to operate a Class


A or Class B commercial motor vehicle for harvest


purposes or a Class D motor vehicle, or


b. a restricted Class B commercial license which shall


grant to the licensee the privilege to operate a Class


B commercial motor vehicle for harvest purposes or a


Class D motor vehicle.



Req. No. 2499 Page 3


6. No person shall operate a Class D motor vehicle unless the


person is sixteen (16) years of age or older and holds a valid Class


D license, except as provided for in Section 6-102 or 6-105 of this


title. Any person holding a valid Class D license shall be


permitted to operate motor vehicles in Class D only.


C. Any person issued a driver license pursuant to this section


may exercise the privilege thereby granted upon all streets and


highways in this state.


D. No person shall operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle


without having a valid Class A, B, C or D license with a motorcycle


endorsement. Except as otherwise provided by law, any new applicant


for an original driver license shall be required to successfully


complete a written examination, vision examination and driving


examination for a motorcycle as prescribed by the Department of


Public Safety, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma, and a certified


state-approved motorcycle basic rider course approved by the


Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma, if the applicant


is seventeen (17) years of age or younger to be eligible for a


motorcycle endorsement thereon on such license. The written


examination and driving examination for a motorcycle shall be waived


by Service Oklahoma upon verification that the person has


successfully completed a certified Motorcycle Safety Foundation


rider course approved by the Department, in conjunction with Service


Oklahoma.

Req. No. 2499 Page 4


E. Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who lawfully


possesses a valid Oklahoma driver license which is eligible for


renewal shall be required to successfully complete a written


examination, vision examination and driving examination for a


motorcycle as prescribed by the Department, in conjunction with


Service Oklahoma, and a certified state-approved motorcycle basic


rider course approved by the Department, in conjunction with Service


Oklahoma, if the person is seventeen (17) years of age or younger to


be eligible for a motorcycle endorsement. The written examination


and driving examination for a motorcycle shall be waived by Service


Oklahoma upon verification that the person has successfully


completed a certified Motorcycle Safety Foundation rider course


approved by the Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma.


F. 1. Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older may apply


for a restricted Class A, B or C commercial learner permit. Service


Oklahoma, after the applicant has passed all parts of the


examination for a Class D license and has successfully passed all


parts of the examination for a Class A, B or C commercial license


other than the driving examination, may issue to the applicant a


commercial learner permit which shall entitle the person having


immediate lawful possession of the commercial learner permit and a


valid Oklahoma driver license or provisional driver license pursuant


to Section 6-212 of this title to operate a Class A, B or C


commercial motor vehicle upon the public highways solely for the

Req. No. 2499 Page 5


purpose of behind-the-wheel training in accordance with rules


promulgated by the Department.


2. This commercial learner permit shall be issued for a period


as provided in Section 6-115 of this title of one (1) year;


provided, such commercial learner permit may be suspended, revoked,


canceled, denied or disqualified at the discretion of the


Department, with notice to Service Oklahoma, for violation of the


restrictions, for failing to give the required or correct


information on the application or for violation of any traffic laws


of this state pertaining to the operation of a motor vehicle.


Except as otherwise provided, the lawful possessor of a commercial


learner permit who has been issued a commercial learner permit for a


minimum of fourteen (14) days may have the restriction requiring an


accompanying driver removed by satisfactorily completing a driver’s


examination; provided, the removal of a restriction shall not


authorize the operation of a Class A, B or C commercial motor


vehicle if such operation is otherwise prohibited by law.


3. No person shall apply for and Service Oklahoma shall not


issue an original Class A, B or C driver license until the person


has been issued a commercial learner permit and held the permit for


at least fourteen (14) days. Any person who currently holds a Class


B or C license and who wishes to apply for another class of


commercial driver license shall be required to apply for a


commercial learner permit and to hold the permit for at least

Req. No. 2499 Page 6


fourteen (14) days before applying for the Class A or B license, as


applicable. Any person who currently holds a Class A, B or C


license and who wishes to add an endorsement or remove a restriction


for which a skills examination is required shall be required to


apply for a commercial learner permit and to hold the permit for at


least fourteen (14) days before applying for the endorsement.


4. A commercial learner permit shall be issued by Service


Oklahoma as a separate and unique document which shall be valid only


in conjunction with a valid Oklahoma driver license or provisional


driver license pursuant to Section 6-212 of this title, both of


which shall be in the possession of the person to whom they have


been issued whenever that person is operating a commercial motor


vehicle as provided in this subsection.


5. After one renewal of a commercial learner permit, as


provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection, a commercial permit


shall not be renewed again. Any person who has held a commercial


learner permit for the initial issuance period and one renewal


period shall not be eligible for and Service Oklahoma shall not


issue another renewal of the permit; provided, the person may


reapply for a new commercial learner permit, as provided for in this


subsection.


G. 1. For purposes of this title:


a. “REAL ID Compliant Driver License” or “Identification


Card” means a driver license or identification card

Req. No. 2499 Page 7


issued by this state that has been certified by the


United States Department of Homeland Security (USDHS)


as compliant with the requirements of the REAL ID Act


of 2005, Public Law P.L. No. 109-13. A REAL ID


Compliant Driver License or Identification Card and


the process through which it is issued incorporate a


variety of security measures designed to protect the


integrity and trustworthiness of the license or card.


A REAL ID Compliant Driver License or Identification


Card will be clearly marked on the face indicating


that it is a compliant document, and


b. “REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License” or


“Identification Card” means a driver license or


identification card issued by this state that has not


been certified by the United States Department of


Homeland Security (USDHS) as being compliant with the


requirements of the REAL ID Act of 2005. A REAL ID


Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card


will be clearly marked on the face indicating that it


is not compliant with the federal REAL ID Act of 2005


and is not acceptable for official federal purposes.


The driver license or identification card will have a


unique design or color indicator that clearly


distinguishes it from a compliant license or card.

Req. No. 2499 Page 8


2. Original Driver License and Identification Card Issuance:


a. Application for an original REAL ID Compliant or REAL


ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card


shall be made to Service Oklahoma or a licensed


operator provided such licensed operator is authorized


to process application for REAL ID Compliant Driver


Licenses and Identification Cards. Application for a


REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification


Card shall be made to Service Oklahoma.


b. Service Oklahoma employees or authorized licensed


operators shall perform all document recognition and


other requirements needed for approval of an original


REAL ID Compliant Driver License or Identification


Card application. Service Oklahoma employees shall


perform all document recognition and other


requirements needed for approval of a REAL ID


Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card


application.


c. Prior to approval of an original REAL ID Noncompliant


Driver License or Identification Card application,


Service Oklahoma shall verify the lawful presence in


the United States of the applicant. Verification of


lawful presence by Service Oklahoma shall require that



Req. No. 2499 Page 9


the applicant execute an affidavit under penalty of


perjury that:


(1) he or she is a United States citizen, or


(2) he or she is a qualified alien under the federal


Immigration and Nationality Act and is lawfully


present in the United States.


Service Oklahoma shall provide notary public services at no


cost to the applicant. The lawful presence of the applicant


shall be verified through the Systematic Alien Verification


for Entitlements (SAVE) Program operated by the United


States Department of Homeland Security or an equivalent


program designated by the United States Department of


Homeland Security. No application shall be approved until


such eligibility verification is made. Any applicant who


knowingly and willfully makes a false, fictitious, or


fraudulent statement of representation in an affidavit


executed pursuant to this paragraph shall have committed the


same offense as provided in subparagraph f of paragraph 2 of


Section 6-301 of this title. If the affidavit constitutes a


false claim of U.S. citizenship under 18 U.S.C., Section


911, a complaint shall be filed by Service Oklahoma with the


United States Attorney General for the applicable district


based upon the venue in which the affidavit was executed.



Req. No. 2499 Page 10


d. Upon approval of an original REAL ID Compliant or REAL


ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card


application, the applicant may take the approved


application document to a licensed operator to receive


a temporary driver license or identification card.


d. e. The licensed operator shall process the approved REAL


ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or


Identification Card application and upon payment shall


provide the applicant a temporary driver license or


identification card. A temporary driver license or


identification card shall afford the holder the


privileges otherwise granted by the specific class of


driver license or identification card for the period


of time listed on the temporary driver license or


identification card or the period of time prior to the


applicant receiving a REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID


Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card,


whichever time period is shorter.


3. REAL ID Compliant Driver License and Identification Card


Renewal and Replacement:


a. Application for renewal or replacement of a REAL ID


Compliant Driver License or Identification Card may be


made to Service Oklahoma or to a licensed operator;,


provided, such licensed operator is authorized to

Req. No. 2499 Page 11


process application for REAL ID Compliant Driver


Licenses and Identification Cards. A licensed


operator may process the voluntary downgrade of a REAL


ID Compliant Commercial Driver License to any lower


class license upon request of the licensee;, provided,


no additional endorsements or restrictions are placed


on the license.


b. Service Oklahoma employees or authorized licensed


operators shall perform all document recognition and


other requirements needed for approval of a renewal or


replacement REAL ID Compliant Driver License or


Identification Card application.


c. Upon approval of a renewal or replacement REAL ID


Compliant Driver License or Identification Card


application, the applicant may receive a temporary


driver license or identification card from Service


Oklahoma or an authorized licensed operator.


d. A temporary driver license or identification card


acquired under the provisions of this paragraph shall


afford the holder the privileges otherwise granted by


the specific class of driver license or identification


card being renewed or replaced for the period of time


listed on the temporary driver license or


identification card or the period of time prior to the

Req. No. 2499 Page 12


applicant receiving a REAL ID Compliant Driver License


or Identification Card, whichever time period is


shorter.


e. For purposes of this title, an application for a REAL


ID Compliant Driver License or Identification Card by


an individual with a valid Oklahoma-issued driver


license or identification card shall be considered a


renewal of a REAL ID Compliant Driver License or


Identification Card.


4. REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License and Identification Card


Renewal and Replacement:


a. Application for renewal or replacement of a REAL ID


Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card may


be made to Service Oklahoma or to a licensed operator.


A licensed operator may process the voluntary


downgrade of a REAL ID Noncompliant Commercial Driver


License to any lower class license upon request of the


licensee;, provided, no additional endorsements or


restrictions are added to the license.


b. Service Oklahoma employees or licensed operators shall


perform all document recognition and other


requirements needed for approval of a renewal or


replacement REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or


Identification Card application.

Req. No. 2499 Page 13


c. Upon approval of a renewal or replacement REAL ID


Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card


application, the applicant may receive a temporary


driver license or identification card from Service


Oklahoma or a licensed operator.


d. A temporary driver license or identification card


acquired under the provisions of this paragraph shall


afford the holder the privileges otherwise granted by


the specific class of driver license or identification


card being renewed or replaced for the period of time


listed on the temporary driver license or


identification card or the period of time prior to the


applicant receiving a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver


License or Identification Card, whichever time period


is shorter.


H. 1. The fee charged for an approved application for an


original Oklahoma REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver


License or an approved application for the addition of an


endorsement to a current valid Oklahoma REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID


Noncompliant Driver License shall be assessed in accordance with the


following schedule:


Class A Commercial Learner


Permit $25.00


Class A Commercial License $25.00

Req. No. 2499 Page 14


Class B Commercial Learner


Permit $15.00


Class B Commercial License $15.00


Class C Commercial Learner


Permit $15.00


Class C Commercial License $15.00


Class D License $ 4.00


Motorcycle Endorsement $ 4.00


2. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this


title, all monies collected from the fees charged for Class A, B and


C commercial licenses pursuant to the provisions of this subsection


shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of this state.


I. The fee charged for any failed examination shall be Four


Dollars ($4.00) for any license classification. Notwithstanding the


provisions of Section 1104 of this title, all monies collected from


such examination fees pursuant to the provisions of this subsection


shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of this state.


J. In addition to any fee charged pursuant to the provisions of


subsection H of this section, the fee charged for the issuance or


renewal of a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License shall be in


accordance with the following schedule; provided, that any applicant


who has a CDL Learner Permit shall be charged only the replacement


fee for the issuance of the license:


License Class 4-year 8-year

Req. No. 2499 Page 15


Class A Commercial Learner


Permit $56.50 $113.00


Class A Commercial License $56.50 $113.00


Class B Commercial Learner


Permit $56.50 $113.00


Class B Commercial License $56.50 $113.00


Class C Commercial Learner


Permit $46.50 $93.00


Class C Commercial License $46.50 $93.00


Class D License $38.50 $77.00


K. In addition to any fee charged pursuant to the provisions of


subsection H of this section, the fee charged for the issuance or


renewal of a REAL ID Compliant Driver License shall be in accordance


with the following schedule; provided, that any applicant who has a


CDL Learner Permit shall be charged only the replacement fee for the


issuance of the license:


License Class 4-year 8-year


REAL ID Compliant Class A


Commercial Learner Permit $56.50 $113.00


REAL ID Compliant Class A


Commercial License $56.50 $113.00


REAL ID Compliant Class B


Commercial Learner Permit $56.50 $113.00



Req. No. 2499 Page 16


REAL ID Compliant Class B


Commercial License $56.50 $113.00


REAL ID Compliant Class C


Commercial Learner Permit $46.50 $93.00


REAL ID Compliant Class C


Commercial License $46.50 $93.00


REAL ID Compliant Class D


License $38.50 $77.00


L. A commercial learner permit may be renewed one time for a


period of one hundred eighty (180) days. The cost for the renewed


permit shall be the same as for the original permit.


M. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this


title, of each fee charged pursuant to the provisions of subsections


J, K and L of this section:


1. Five Dollars and fifty cents ($5.50) of a 4-year license or


Eleven Dollars ($11.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to


the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in Section 1-


2530.9 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. Six Dollars and seventy-five cents ($6.75) of a 4-year


license or Thirteen Dollars and fifty cents ($13.50) of an 8-year


license shall be deposited to the Department of Public Safety


Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used solely for the


purpose of administration and maintenance of the computerized


imaging system of the Department through October 31, 2022.

Req. No. 2499 Page 17


Beginning November 1, 2022, Six Dollars and seventy-five cents


($6.75) of a 4-year license or Thirteen Dollars and fifty cents


($13.50) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the Service


Oklahoma Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used solely


for the purpose of administration and maintenance of the


computerized imaging system of Service Oklahoma;


3. Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year license or Twenty Dollars


($20.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the Department


of Public Safety Revolving Fund for all original or renewal


issuances of licenses through October 31, 2022. Beginning November


1, 2022, Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year license or Twenty Dollars


($20.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the Service


Oklahoma Revolving Fund for all original or renewal issuances of


licenses; and


4. Five Dollars ($5.00) of a 4-year license or Six Dollars


($6.00) of an 8-year license shall be deposited to the State Public


Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this title.


N. All original and renewal driver licenses shall expire as


provided in Section 6-115 of this title.


O. 1. Through May 31, 2025, any person sixty-two (62) to


sixty-four (64) years of age during the calendar year of issuance or


renewal of a Class D license or motorcycle endorsement shall be


charged the following prorated fee:


4-year 8-year

Req. No. 2499 Page 18


Age 62 $21.25 $42.50


Age 63 $17.50 $35.00


Age 64 $13.75 $27.50


2. Any person sixty-five (65) years of age or older during the


calendar year of issuance or renewal of a Class D license or


motorcycle endorsement shall not be charged a fee.


P. No person who has been honorably discharged from active


service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or


Oklahoma National Guard and who has been certified by the United


States Department of Veterans Affairs, its successor or the Armed


Forces of the United States to be a disabled veteran in receipt of


compensation at the one-hundred-percent rate for a permanent


disability sustained through military action or accident resulting


from disease contracted while in such active service and registered


with the veterans registry created by the Oklahoma Department of


Veterans Affairs shall be charged a fee for the issuance,


replacement or renewal of an Oklahoma driver license; provided, that


if a veteran has been previously exempt from a fee pursuant to this


subsection, no registration with the veterans registry shall be


required.


Q. In accordance with the provisions of subsection G of this


section, Service Oklahoma is authorized to promulgate rules for the


issuance and renewal of driver licenses authorized pursuant to the


provisions of Sections 6-101 through 6-309 of this title; provided,

Req. No. 2499 Page 19


that no such rules applicable to the issuance or renewal of REAL ID


Noncompliant Driver Licenses shall create more stringent standards


than such rules applicable as of January 1, 2017, unless directly


related to a specific change in statutory law concerning standards


for REAL ID Noncompliant Driver Licenses. Applications, upon forms


approved by Service Oklahoma, for such licenses shall be handled, in


accordance with the provisions of subsection G of this section, by


the licensed operator; provided, Service Oklahoma is authorized to


assume these duties in any county of this state. Each licensed


operator accepting applications for driver licenses shall receive


Six Dollars ($6.00) for a 4-year REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License


or Twelve Dollars ($12.00) for an 8-year REAL ID Noncompliant Driver


License or Ten Dollars ($10.00) for a 4-year REAL ID Compliant


Driver License or Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for an 8-year REAL ID


Compliant Driver License to be deducted from the total collected for


each license or renewal application accepted through June 30, 2023.


Beginning July 1, 2022, and ending on June 30, 2023, each motor


license agent or licensed operator accepting applications for driver


licenses for individuals over the age of sixty-five (65) years or


for applications for drivers pursuant to subsection P of this


section shall receive Six Dollars ($6.00) for a 4-year driver


license or Twelve Dollars ($12.00) for an 8-year driver license to


be deducted daily by the motor license agent or licensed operator


receipts. Beginning July 1, 2023, these fees shall be retained by

Req. No. 2499 Page 20


the licensed operator pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of


this title. The fees received by the licensed operator, authorized


by this subsection, shall be used for operating expenses. The


amount retained pursuant to this subsection shall not be retained by


any state agency. The fees received by the licensed operator,


authorized by this subsection, shall be used for operating expenses.


For purposes of this subsection, “licensed operator” shall mean an


individual who obtains a license from the Service Oklahoma Operator


Board to operate a designated Service Oklahoma location and offers


third-party fulfillment of designated services to be rendered by


Service Oklahoma.


R. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this title


and subsection Q of this section and except as provided in


subsections H and M of this section, the first Sixty Thousand


Dollars ($60,000.00) of all monies collected pursuant to this


section shall be paid by the Oklahoma Tax Commission to the State


Treasurer to be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of the State


Treasury.


The next Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) of monies


collected pursuant to this section shall be paid by the Tax


Commission to the State Treasurer to be deposited each fiscal year


under the provisions of this section to the credit of the Department


of Public Safety Restricted Revolving Fund for the purpose of the


Oklahoma Law Enforcement Telecommunications System. All other

Req. No. 2499 Page 21


monies collected in excess of Five Hundred Sixty Thousand Dollars


($560,000.00) each fiscal year shall be apportioned as provided in


Section 1104 of this title, except as otherwise provided in this


section.


S. Service Oklahoma shall retain the images displayed on


licenses and identification cards issued pursuant to the provisions


of Sections 6-101 through 6-309 of this title which may be used


only:


1. By a law enforcement agency for purposes of criminal


investigations, missing person investigations or any law enforcement


purpose which is deemed necessary by the Commissioner of Public


Safety;


2. By the driver licensing agency of another state for its


official purpose; and


3. As provided in Section 2-110 of this title.


All agencies approved by the Oklahoma Law Enforcement


Telecommunications System (OLETS) or the National Law Enforcement


Telecommunications System (NLETS) to receive photographs or


computerized images may obtain them through OLETS or through NLETS.


Photographs or computerized images may be obtained by law


enforcement one inquiry at a time.


The computer system and related equipment acquired for this


purpose must conform to industry standards for interoperability and



Req. No. 2499 Page 22


open architecture. The Department of Public Safety may promulgate


rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.


T. No person may hold more than one state-issued or territory-


issued driver license or identification card from Oklahoma or any


other state or territory. Service Oklahoma shall not issue a driver


license to a person who has been previously issued a driver license


or identification card until such license or identification card has


been surrendered to Service Oklahoma by the applicant. Provided,


any person who holds both a driver license and identification card


from Oklahoma as of November 1, 2025, may continue to possess both


credentials until the first expiration of either credential. At


that time, the person shall be allowed to retain, replace, or renew


either the driver license or identification card and shall surrender


the second credential to Service Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma may


promulgate rules related to the issuance of replacement REAL ID


Compliant Driver Licenses in the event of loss or theft.


U. Beginning May 24, 2021, and ending on June 30, 2023, in


addition to the amounts provided in subsection Q of this section, a


licensed operator shall receive Five Dollars ($5.00) for each


processed application for a REAL ID Compliant 4-year Driver License


and Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each processed application for a REAL


ID Compliant 8-year Driver License. Any additional amounts provided


pursuant to this subsection shall not be retained by Service


Oklahoma.

Req. No. 2499 Page 23


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2499 MSBB 12/10/2025 1:23:45 PM











































Req. No. 2499 Page 24